Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 9
BALLOT ISSUE NOTICES

Editor's note:

This part 9 was added in 1994. This part 9 was amended with relocations in 1996, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 9 prior to 1996, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

1-7-901. Receipt of comments concerning ballot issues.

Each political subdivision shall accept written comments concerning ballot issues in accordance with this section.

All comments filed in writing will be received and kept on file with the designated election official for the political subdivision submitting to its eligible electors the ballot issue to which the comments pertain. However, only those comments that are filed by persons eligible to vote in the political subdivision submitting the ballot issue to its electors must be summarized in the ballot issue notice. The filed comments shall be retained by the designated election official as election records.

To be summarized in the ballot issue notice, the comments shall address a specific ballot issue and shall include a signature and an address where the signor is registered to vote and shall be filed with the designated election official for the political subdivision and not the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the political subdivision is located unless the issue is a county issue for which the county clerk and recorder is the designated election official.

Since section 20 (3)(b)(v) of article X of the state constitution requires that comments pertaining to a ballot issue be filed by forty-five days before the election and since such day is always a Saturday, all comments shall be filed by noon on the Friday before the forty-fifth day before the election.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 1747, § 44, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(4) amended, p. 1099, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 99:

(4) amended, p. 775, § 54, effective May 20.

L. 2018:

(4) amended, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1611, § 22, effective May 29.

1-7-902. Preparation of fiscal information.

A governing body submitting a referred measure, or its designee, shall be responsible for providing to its designated election official the fiscal information that must be included in the ballot issue notice. For political subdivisions, the governing body shall be the board that authorized submission of the ballot issue to the electorate.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 1747, § 44, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 299, § 9, effective August 2.

1-7-903. Preparation of written comments.

For referred measures, the designated election official shall summarize the filed comments in favor of and in opposition to the ballot issue for the ballot issue notice.

For initiated measures, the petition representatives shall be solely responsible for summarizing all comments filed in favor of the ballot issue. The designated election official shall summarize all comments filed in opposition to the ballot issue.

Petition representatives required to summarize favorable comments in favor of their petition shall submit the summary in typewritten form to the designated election official for the jurisdiction in which the petition is presented no later than forty-four days before the election. If a summary is not filed by the petition representatives within the time allowed, the designated election official shall print the following in the ballot issue notice where the summary would appear: "No summary was filed by the statutory deadline."

(3.5) For political subdivisions of the state, including but not limited to special districts, that have no designated election official, the governing body of a political subdivision shall be solely responsible for preparing the summary of the filed comments in favor of and in opposition to the ballot issue for the ballot issue notice required by section 20 (3)(b)(v) of article X of the state constitution.

If no comments are filed in opposition to or in support of a ballot issue, the designated election official shall not prepare any summaries and shall state substantially the following in the ballot issue notice where the summary or summaries would appear: "No comments were filed by the constitutional deadline."

The provisions of this section shall not apply to a statewide ballot issue that is subject to the provisions of section 1 (7.5) of article V of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 1747, § 44, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(3) amended, p. 1099, § 2, effective May 27.

L. 99:

(3) amended, p. 776, § 55, effective May 20.

L. 2010:

(3.5) added, (HB 10-1116), ch. 194, p. 833, § 17, effective May 5.

L. 2018:

(3) amended, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1611, § 23, effective May 29.

1-7-904. Transmittal of notices.

Notwithstanding the provision for independent mail ballot elections in section 1-7-116 (1), the designated election official or the official's designee for a political subdivision conducting an election in November shall prepare and deliver to the county clerk and recorder for the county or counties in which the political subdivision is located no later than forty-three days before the election the full text of any required ballot issue notices.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 1748, § 44, effective July 1.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1100, § 3, effective May 27.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 776, § 56, effective May 20.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 299, § 10, effective August 2.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1612, § 24, effective May 29.

1-7-905. Preparation of notices.

For coordinated elections, the county clerk and recorder is responsible for placing the ballot issue notices received from the various political subdivisions participating in the election in the proper order in the ballot issue notice packet. As nearly as practicable, the notice must be in the order the ballot issues will appear on the ballot. The ballot issue notice must be followed by a certification by the county clerk and recorder that the ballot issue notices are complete as submitted by the political subdivisions. No additional information may be included as part of the ballot issue notice except as may be required by law. A general disclaimer may precede or follow the ballot issue notice which states: "The information contained in this notice was prepared by persons required by law to provide summaries of ballot issues and fiscal information."

The designated election officials of overlapping political subdivisions conducting an election other than a coordinated election shall confer concerning the preparation of the ballot issue notice no later than forty days prior to the date of the election. The political subdivisions conducting the election shall provide for preparation of any required ballot issue notice package by agreement in a form substantially as provided in section 1-7-116.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 1748, § 44, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(2) amended, p. 776, § 57, effective May 20.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 581, § 48, effective May 18.

1-7-905.5. Form of notice.

The ballot issue notice must begin with the words "All registered voters", regardless of whether the electors of the political subdivision must be registered electors to be eligible to vote in the election, and ends at the conclusion of the summary of comments. Any information concerning procedure for an election or other information included with the ballot issue notice prior to the words "All registered voters", or after the conclusion of the summary of comments, are not deemed to be part of the ballot issue notice.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 1748, § 44, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 724, § 78, effective May 10.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 581, § 49, effective May 18.

L. 2019:

(2) repealed, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3029, § 39, effective August 2.

Cross references:

(1) In 2013, subsection (1) was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(2) For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

1-7-906. Mailing of notices.

For coordinated elections, the county clerk and recorder as coordinated election official shall mail the ballot issue notice packet to each address of one or more active registered electors who reside in the county or portions of the county in which registered voters of those districts submitting ballot issues reside.

The designated election official for the various political subdivisions shall be responsible for mailing the required notice to each address of one or more active registered electors who do not reside within the county or counties where the political subdivision is located.

The political subdivisions shall by agreement, in a form substantially as provided in sections 1-7-116 and 1-7-905, provide for mailing of any required ballot issue notice package for elections conducted other than coordinated elections.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 1749, § 44, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(1) and (3) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 581, § 50, effective May 18.

1-7-907. Ballot issue notice.

The ballot issue notice shall be prepared and mailed in substantial compliance with section 20 of article X of the state constitution, the provisions of this title, and the rules and regulations of the secretary of state.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire part amended with relocations, p. 1749, § 44, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-5-206.5 as it existed prior to 1996.

1-7-908. Additional notice - election to create financial obligation.

A district submitting a ballot issue concerning the creation of any debt or other financial obligation at an election in the district shall post notice of the following information on the district's website or, if the district does not maintain a website, at the district's chief administrative office no later than twenty days before the election:

The district's ending general fund balance for the last four fiscal years and the projected ending general fund balance for the current fiscal year;

A statement of the total revenues in and expenditures from the district's general fund for the last four fiscal years and the projected total revenues in and expenditures from the general fund for the current fiscal year;

The amount of any debt or other financial obligation incurred by the district for each of the last four fiscal years for cash flow purposes that has a term of not more than one year and the amount of any such financial obligation projected for the current fiscal year;

A statement as to whether the district's emergency reserve required by section 20 (5) of article X of the state constitution has been fully funded by cash or investments for the current fiscal year and each of the last four fiscal years and an identification of the funds or accounts in which the reserve is currently held. If the reserve has not been fully funded, the notice shall include a statement of the reasons the reserve has not been fully funded.

The location or locations at which any person may review the district's audited financial statements for the last four fiscal years, any management letters that have been made public and have been provided to the district by its auditors in connection with the preparation of its audits for the last four fiscal years, and the district's budget for the current fiscal year.

If the debt or other financial obligation for which the district is seeking voter approval is to be paid from a revenue source that is accounted for in a fund other than the district's general fund, the information required by subparagraphs (I) and (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall also be made available for such other fund.

The information required by subparagraphs (I), (II), (III), and (IV) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall be based upon audited figures. If no audited figures are available, the information shall be based upon estimated figures.

The notice required by this section shall be in addition to and shall not substitute, replace, or be combined with any other notice required by law.

For purposes of this section, "district" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 20 (2)(b) of article X of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 748, § 1, effective August 6.